Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1353
Construction contracts; request authorization to bid; issuance to certain bidders.

(1) Any person desiring to bid on any contract for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances to be let by the department shall request an authorization to bid from the department at the offices of the department in Lincoln, Nebraska, or at such other location as designated by the department not later than 5 p.m. of the day before the letting of the contract.

(2) Such authorization shall be issued only to those persons previously qualified by the department and bids shall be accepted only from such qualified persons. This subsection shall not apply to any contract granted an exemption from prequalification requirements pursuant to subsection (2) of section 39-1351.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 53, p. 440;

Laws 1969, c. 333, § 2, p. 1189;

Laws 1995, LB 447, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB312, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 131;

Laws 2019, LB117, § 3.